North Carolina, session 2025, SB526.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Hands Free NC Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-137.3, 20-137.4, and 20-137.4A are repealed.
SECTION 3. Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-137.3A. Unlawful use of a wireless communication device.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Emergency situation. – Circumstances such as medical concerns, unsafe road
conditions, matters of public safety, or mechanical problems that create a risk
of harm for the operator or passengers of a motor vehicle.
(2) Operate a motor vehicle. – Operating a motor vehicle on a public street,
highway, or public vehicular area. The term does not include situations where
the motor vehicle is off, or to the side of, a public street, highway, or public
vehicular area in a location where the motor vehicle can safely remain
stationary.
(3) School bus. – As defined in G.S. 20-4.01(27)n. The term also includes any
school activity bus, as defined in G.S. 20-4.01(27)m., and any vehicle
transporting public, private, or parochial school students for compensation.
(4) Texting. – Manually entering text into, or reading text from, a wireless
communication device. The term includes short message services, emailing,
instant messaging, a command or request to access a webpage, pressing more
than a single button to initiate or terminate a call, or engaging in any other
form of electronic text retrieval or entry, for present or future communication.
(5) Wireless communication device. – Any of the following:
a. A cell phone, personal digital assistant, electronic device with mobile
data access, laptop computer, pager, smartwatch, broadband personal
communication device, electronic game, and portable computing
device.
b. A device through which personal wireless services, as defined in 47
U.S.C. § 332(c)(7)(C)(i), are transmitted.
(b) Prohibited Conduct. – No person shall operate a motor vehicle under any of the
following circumstances:
*S526-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) With a wireless communication device in the person's hand.
(2) While watching a video or movie or communicating by video on a wireless
communication device.
(3) While texting on a wireless communication device.
(c) Persons Under 18 Years of Age. – No person under the age of 18 years shall operate
a motor vehicle while using a wireless communication device, except (i) to follow the route
recommended by an electronic navigation system, so long as all address information is entered
before operating the vehicle, and (ii) as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of this
section.
(d) Exceptions. – Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) The use of a wireless communication device for the purpose of
communicating an emergency situation to any of the following:
a. An emergency response operator.
b. A publicly or privately owned ambulance company or service.
c. A hospital.
d. A fire department.
e. A law enforcement agency.
(2) The use of a wireless communication device by any of the following while in
the performance of official duties:
a. A law enforcement officer.
b. A member of a fire department.
c. The operator of a public or private ambulance.
d. A first responder responsible for the protection and preservation of
life, property, evidence, or the environment.
e. The operator of a vehicle registered to a public utility or
communications service provider when the operator is an employee of
the public utility or communications service provider using the device
to carry out official duties.
f. An amateur radio operator responding to an emergency situation.
g. The operator of a vehicle registered to a public water system, as
defined in G.S. 130A-313, or to a public or community wastewater
system, as defined in G.S. 130A-334, when the operator is an
employee of a system using the device to carry out official duties.
(3) An operator of a commercial motor vehicle who is using a two-way radio
device or its equivalent.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits the use, while operating a motor vehicle, of
manufacturer-installed or aftermarket equipment that is integrated into the vehicle.
(f) Penalties. – Any person who violates this section shall be penalized as follows:
(1) A person who violates this section and has not previously been found
responsible for a violation that occurred within the 36-month period prior to
the date of the current violation is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine
of one hundred dollars ($100.00) and no insurance points.
(2) A person who violates this section and has previously been found responsible
for a violation of this section that occurred within the 36-month period prior
to the date of the current violation is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a
fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) and insurance points as authorized
by G.S. 58-36-75(i).
(3) A person who violates this section and has previously been found responsible
for two or more violations of this section that occurred within the 36-month
period prior to the date of the current violation is guilty of an infraction,
Page 2 Senate Bill 526-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
punishable by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200.00) and insurance points as
authorized by G.S. 58-36-75(i).
(4) A person who violates this section while operating a school bus shall be
subject to the penalties provided in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this
subsection but is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor for any violation instead of
an infraction.
(g) Seizure. – The provisions of this section shall not be construed as authorizing the
seizure or forfeiture of a wireless communication device.
(h) Local Ordinance. – No local government may pass an ordinance regulating the use of
a wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle.
(i) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Superintendent of Public Instruction
shall incorporate in driver education programs and driver licensing programs instructions
designed to encourage compliance with this section as an important means of reducing motor
vehicle accidents and on the requirements and penalties specified in this law."
SECTION 4. G.S. 58-36-75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i) Unlawful Use of a Wireless Communication Device. – The North Carolina Rate
Bureau shall assign one insurance point under the Safe Driver Incentive Plan for a person found
responsible under G.S. 20-137.3A(f)(2) and two insurance points for a person found responsible
under G.S. 20-137.3A(f)(3)."
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 20-4.01(41a) reads as rewritten:
"(41a) Serious Traffic Violation. – A conviction of one of the following offenses
when operating a commercial or other motor vehicle:
…
i. Unlawful use of a mobile telephone under G.S. 20-137.4A
G.S. 20-137.3A or Part 390 or Part 392 of Title 49 of the Code of
Federal Regulations while operating a commercial motor vehicle."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 20-11(c)(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) The permit holder shall not use a mobile telephone or other additional
technology associated with a mobile telephone wireless communication
device while operating the motor vehicle on a public street or highway or
public vehicular area."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 20-11(d)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Has not been convicted of a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt
infraction or a violation of G.S. 20-137.3 G.S. 20-137.3A during the preceding
six months."
SECTION 5.(d) G.S. 20-11(e)(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) The license holder shall not use a mobile telephone or other additional
technology associated with a mobile telephone wireless communication
device while operating the vehicle on a public street or highway or public
vehicular area."
SECTION 5.(e) G.S. 20-11(f)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Has not been convicted of a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt
infraction or a violation of G.S. 20-137.3 G.S. 20-137.3A during the preceding
six months."
SECTION 5.(f) G.S. 20-11(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) Level 3 Restrictions. – The restrictions on Level 1 and Level 2 drivers concerning
time of driving, supervision, and passenger limitations do not apply to a full provisional license.
However, the prohibition against operating a motor vehicle while using a mobile telephone
wireless communication device under G.S. 20-137.3(b) G.S. 20-137.3A shall apply to a full
provisional license."
SECTION 5.(g) G.S. 20-11(l) reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 526-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(l) Violations. – It is unlawful for the holder of a limited learner's permit, a temporary
permit, or a limited provisional license to drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
that apply to the permit or license. Failure to comply with a restriction concerning the time of
driving or the presence of a supervising driver in the vehicle constitutes operating a motor vehicle
without a license. Failure to comply with the restriction regarding the use of a mobile telephone
wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle is an infraction punishable by a
fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). as provided in G.S. 20-137.3A. Failure to comply with any
other restriction, including seating and passenger limitations, is an infraction punishable by a
monetary penalty as provided in G.S. 20-176. Failure to comply with the provisions of
subsections (e) and (g) of this section shall not constitute negligence per se or contributory
negligence by the driver or passenger in any action for the recovery of damages arising out of the
operation, ownership or maintenance of a motor vehicle. Any evidence of failure to comply with
the provisions of subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subsection (e) of this section shall not
be admissible in any criminal or civil trial, action, or proceeding except in an action based on a
violation of this section. No drivers license points or insurance surcharge shall be assessed for
failure to comply with seating and occupancy limitations in subsection (e) of this section. No
drivers license points or insurance surcharge shall be assessed for failure to comply with
subsection (e) or (g) of this section regarding the use of a mobile telephone while operating a
motor vehicle."
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date. For the six months immediately after the effective date of this
act, law enforcement shall only issue warning tickets for offenses committed. Prosecutions for
offenses committed under G.S. 20-137.3, 20-137.4, and 20-137.4A before the effective date of
this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for
this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.
Page 4 Senate Bill 526-First Edition